District of Columbia statutes.
42-520

Estates by sufferance.

All estates which by construction of the courts were estates from year to year at common law, as where a tenant goes into possession and pays rent without an agreement for a term, or where a tenant for years, after the expiration of his term, continues in possession and pays rent and the like, and all verbal hirings by the month or at any specified rate per month, shall be deemed estates by sufferance.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1352, ch. 854, § 1034
June 30, 1902, 32 Stat. 538, ch. 1329
Statute of frauds, see §§ 28-3501 and 28-3503.
1981 Ed., § 45-220.
1973 Ed., § 45-820.